web/comori-od-es/hunspell/ro_simple/ro_simple.dic
aalenian/q
abstractiv/D
achizitiv/D
aciuas/P
aclinic/S
acvaterariu/P
acvatic/S
adaptativ/D
adhortativ/D
aerobiotic/S
aerotopograf/P
agabaritic/S
agroameliorativ/D
agrometeorologic/S
albuminometru/P
alcoolic/S
algologic/S
altaic/S
altitelemetru/P
altoi/z
amendativ/D
amnarus/P
ampelografic/S
amplificativ/D
anafilactic/S
analitic/S
analog/q
anastomotic/S
ancolaj/P
angloamerican/q
aniversativ/D
anorectic/S
antal/P
antiamerican/q
antic/S
antifonic/S
antinomic/S
antirepublican/q
antiseismic/S
antisicativ/D
antizimic/S
antofag/q
antrenament/P
aperiodic/S
apetitiv/D
apraxic/S
aprozar/P
araucan/q
argumentativ/D
aritmogrif/P
artritic/S
asediu/P
asertiv/D
aspectiv/D
astmatic/S
ateneu/P
atentiv/D
atomoelectric/S
autoadeziv/D
autocamion/P
autoritativ/D
autoturism/P
axonometric/S
baban/q
badinaj/P
balanofag/q
balonaj/P
barigiroscop/P
batometru/P
batracofag/q
bazic/S
bentofag/q
bibliofag/q
bibliofilm/P
bijectiv/D
bimetalic/S
biofag/q
biologic/S
biotit/P
blagocestiv/D
blastodermic/S
bolborosit/P
boloboc/z
botisor/P
brumatic/S
branet/P
bugetivor/D
bulin/P
butoi/z
balbor/P
bacauan/q
cadastru/P
calcivor/D
caldecan/q
calic/S
caliciu/P
calitativ/D
canton/P
carcan/P
cardiotoxic/S
caritativ/D
carpofag/q
cartular/P
catodic/S
cauper/P
ceasoslov/z
celebrativ/D
celomat/P
centrafrican/q
cerificator/P
cetonic/S
cheratom/z
chiloman/P
chisav/D
chistoc/z
cifric/S
cimentometru/P
ciomagel/P
cistosarcom/z
citologic/S
clapotaj/P
cliseu/P
coclet/P
cocolos/z
coercitiv/D
coeziv/D
cojoc/z
coleretic/S
colocviu/P
comentativ/D
comiserativ/D
comizerativ/D
compendiu/P
compensativ/D
compilativ/D
compozitiv/D
comprehensiv/D
compulsiv/D
comutativ/D
concesiv/D
condensiv/D
condom/z
conductometru/P
confesiv/D
conjunctiv/D
consecutiv/D
considerativ/D
constativ/D
conteiner/P
contraceptiv/D
contrarotativ/D
control/z
converter/P
cooperativ/D
coordonativ/D
coprofag/q
cornet/P
coroliflor/D
corporativ/D
cosmogonic/S
cotlonas/P
creativ/D
creofag/q
crestet/P
culminativ/D
cuplaj/P
curativ/D
cvadricolor/D
cvietiv/D
cavalas/P
declamativ/D
decliv/D
decorativ/D
decupaj/P
defectiv/D
definitiv/D
degresiv/D
deictic/S
dendrofag/q
deopotriv/D
depresiometru/P
descongestiv/D
desicativ/D
detersiv/D
detritofag/q
dezechilibru/P
deziderativ/D
diamagnetic/S
diferentiativ/D
digestiv/D
directiv/D
disculet/P
disipativ/D
disuasiv/D
divulgativ/D
documentaristic/S
dominican/q
donativ/D
dramboi/P
echilibristic/S
economizor/P
edificativ/D
elastic/S
elativ/D
electronic/S
electrovehicul/P
emancipativ/D
embriotomic/S
endofag/q
endotermic/S
endoxilofag/q
energofag/q
entomofag/q
epicotil/P
epidictic/S
epizoocor/D
ergativ/D
ergonomic/S
escesiv/D
etimologic/S
eudiometru/P
eupeptic/S
eurafrican/q
eurifag/q
excluziv/D
exemplificativ/D
explosiv/D
exsudativ/D
extralingvistic/S
extruziv/D
facoscop/P
fatidic/S
fesnic/P
filofag/q
filologic/S
fitofag/q
flegmatic/S
florilegiu/P
fonologic/S
fotocuplor/P
fotomicrografic/S
franciscan/q
fructiflor/D
ftizic/S
fumoar/P
fungivor/D
galactofag/q
galican/q
gaussmetru/P
genic/S
geofag/q
germanic/S
gheomotoc/z
ghionder/P
glandivor/D
golomoz/z
gongoric/S
gradient/P
granivor/D
gulet/P
guvernativ/D
hagiologic/S
helicopter/P
heliometric/S
hematofag/q
hemofag/q
hemoragic/S
hepatom/z
heterofag/q
hidradenom/z
hidrodinamic/S
himeric/S
hiperactiv/D
hiperbolograf/P
hipodermic/S
hipofag/q
homeopatic/S
homofag/q
hrisov/z
harjait/P
iarmaroc/z
idilic/S
ihtiofag/q
imagistic/S
imprecativ/D
impresariat/P
inciziv/D
informativ/D
initiatic/S
insectivor/D
insonor/q
intelectiv/D
intestin/P
intransitiv/D
iodometric/S
italic/S
ivorian/q
izocor/D
jamaican/q
jupon/P
lactogenetic/S
latinoamerican/q
lazaret/P
leucom/z
limfadenom/z
limfangiom/z
limfom/z
limfosarcom/z
limivor/D
limnimetric/S
linou/P
lipofibrom/z
lipom/z
liposarco/z
liposarcom/z
litofag/q
luciferic/S
lampas/P
laptoc/z
latoc/z
magnetohidrodinamic/S
mahomedan/q
malofag/q
manechin/P
marocan/q
martian/q
matrimoniu/P
matronimic/S
melanom/z
melanosarcom/z
melifag/q
melodramatic/S
metalin/P
metalochimic/S
meteorologic/S
metronom/z
mexican/q
miasmatic/S
micetofag/q
microdispozitiv/D
microporcesor/P
midriatic/S
mijloc/z
miniteatru/P
mirmecofag/q
mitotic/S
mondiras/P
monobazic/S
monofag/q
monolitic/S
monom/z
morosliv/D
mozambican/q
mucenic/S
muiaj/P
multiprotocol/z
murg/q
manusar/P
neartistic/S
necrofag/q
nenoroc/z
neocatolic/S
nepolitic/S
neurom/z
nevrednic/S
nevrom/z
nituit/P
nord-american/q
noroc/z
nostalgic/S
nucivor/D
nutritiv/D
obroc/z
ocitocic/S
ocol/z
octavin/P
ofiofag/q
ogarnic/S
ojoc/z
omofag/q
oncologic/S
oofag/q
opaiet/P
opiofag/q
optometric/S
ornitocor/D
ornitofag/q
ortodontic/S
orasenism/P
ospatarnic/S
ostrov/z
paiet/P
paleoantropologic/S
paleozoologic/S
palinofag/q
panafrican/q
panamerican/q
panteistic/S
pantofag/q
paragramatism/P
paralitic/S
parazitolog/q
parodic/S
parodontom/z
patronaj/P
pectic/S
pedoameliorativ/D
pelofag/q
perfograf/P
perimetric/S
perinoc/z
perspectiv/D
picat/P
piretic/S
pistil/P
pistol/z
planctofag/q
planctonofag/q
planisferic/S
pleiofag/q
plivit/P
plurativ/D
pneumatolitic/S
pocinoc/z
poliamid/P
policiclic/S
polifag/q
poliflor/D
polinom/z
polisintetic/S
politolog/q
portmanuscris/P
portorican/q
postalion/z
prebiotic/S
preemptiv/D
preludiu/P
prior/D
pristornic/P
proafrican/q
proamerican/q
procuror/D
procuror/q
profetic/S
proteiptiv/D
protidic/S
protocol/z
protoplast/P
psaltic/S
psihologic/S
punctaj/P
paduratic/S
patimitiv/D
paunar/P
radioizotopic/S
rafinament/P
recreditiv/D
refractiv/D
refractometru/P
reoscopic/S
repetitiv/D
reptilivor/D
reticulocit/P
rezultativ/D
rinolog/q
rizofag/q
rolisor/P
romantolog/q
romascan/q
rostogol/z
rotocol/z
rotogol/z
runolog/q
rusav/D
raschitor/P
razboinic/S
salonican/q
saprofag/q
scatofag/q
scheleton/P
selenolog/q
semagraf/P
semantic/S
semiinstinctiv/D
sfaraiac/P
sicativ/D
simbol/z
simptom/z
sociocognitiv/D
sofism/P
soroc/z
speculativ/D
spinotalamic/S
spirograf/P
stomatolog/q
stop-cadru/P
subjonctiv/D
subtensiv/D
sud-african/q
sud-american/q
suflet/P
superlativ/D
supresiv/D
sustractiv/D
sacultet/P
saracan/q
tahistoscopic/S
tandur/P
taroc/z
tehnolog/q
tehnopsihologic/S
telecontrol/z
telescriptor/P
tematologic/S
teratom/z
terminativ/D
termoelectric/S
termostat/P
tiflografic/S
tomberon/P
toscan/q
toxic/S
toxicolog/q
trahom/z
transafrican/q
trapozoedru/P
traumatolog/q
trematofor/D
tribologic/S
trinom/z
trireactor/P
turbopropulsor/P
tarcol/z
ulcerativ/D
ultrasonic/S
ultrasonoscop/P
univor/D
vag/q
vaiet/P
vatican/q
vecinic/S
venerolog/q
versiflor/D
vestmant/P
vizualizor/D
vocabulariu/P
voloc/z
voltaic/S
vulcanolog/q
wattmetru/P
xantoclor/q
zavistnic/S
zoolog/q
zumzet/P
zabauc/D
zadarnic/S
zalauan/q
inghesuit/P
sifon/P
subler/P
turcan/q
